src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_5b_е́ть_R_безл.
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON св_нп_5b_е́ть
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_5b_е́ть_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON св_5b?_е́ть
св_нп_5b_е́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_5b_я́ть
св_5b?_я́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн.
св_5b?_я́ть_повел._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_5b_я́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R ;

LEXICON св_5b_я́ть_R_повел._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R_ImpPrb ;

LEXICON св_нп_5b_я́ть
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_ImpPrb ;

LEXICON св_5b?_я́ть
св_нп_5b_я́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_5b?_я́ть_повел._затрудн.
св_нп_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_ImpPrb ;

LEXICON св-нсв_[но_в_прош._и_инф._преимущ._св]_нп_5b_е́ть
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end ;

LEXICON нсв_5b/c''_а́ть_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_shift''_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON св_5b/c_а́ть
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_5b/c_а́ть
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_5b/c''_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_shift''_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_а́ть
нсв_нп_5c_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_5c?_а́ть
нсв_нп_5c_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_а́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_а́ть_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_5c_а́ть
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_5c4_а́ть
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift4 ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_е́ть
нсв_нп_5c_е́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_5c4?_е́ть
нсв_нп_5c_е́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift4_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_5c'?_е́ть_наст._2_ед._хо/чешь,_3_ед._хо/чет
+V+Impf+TV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg1:%^M%<у́ # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg2:%^M%<ешь # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg3:%^M%<ет # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl1:%<и́м # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl2:%<и́те # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl3:%<я́т # ;
+V+Impf+TV:%<я́ PresAct ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg1+Pass+Fac:%^M%<у́сь # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg2+Pass+Fac:%^M%<ешься # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg3+Pass:%^M%<ется # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl1+Pass+Fac:%<и́мся # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl2+Pass+Fac:%<и́тесь # ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl3+Pass:%<я́тся # ;
+V+Impf+TV:%<я́ PresAct_Pass ;

LEXICON св_5c'?_е́ть_буд._2_ед._хо/ч|ешь,_3_ед._-ет
св_нп_5c_-хотеть ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:%^M%<у́ # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:%^M%<ешь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:%^M%<ет # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:%<и́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:%<и́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:%<я́т # ;
+V+Perf+TV: Imper_stressed ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:%<и́м # ;

LEXICON св_нп_5c_-хотеть
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:%^M%<у́ # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:%^M%<ешь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:%^M%<ет # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:%<и́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:%<и́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:%<я́т # ;
+V+Perf+IV: Imper_stressed ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:%<и́м # ;

LEXICON св_5c'_е́ть_R_безл._-хотеться
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_е́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_е́ть_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_5c_е́ть_R_безл._хотеться
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_shift_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_5c_е́ть
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_5c_а́ть
св_5c?_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_5c_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_5c_а́ть
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_5c?_а́ть
св_нп_5b_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_5c_е́ть
св_5c?_е́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_5cs_е́ть
св_5c?_е́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св_5c_е́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_5c_е́ть
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_5c?_е́ть
св_нп_5b_е́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON нсв_5c/cs_гнать
+V+Impf+IV:на́ Impf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́н Impf_Pres_2_shift ;
+V+Impf+TV:на́ Impf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Impf+TV:о́н Impf_Pres_2_shift ;
+V+Impf+TV:на́ PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_5c/c''_гнаться
+V+Impf+IV:на́ Impf_Inf_shift_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́н Impf_Pres_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_5c/c_-гнать
+V+Perf+IV:на́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́н Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:на́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́н Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:на PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_5c/c''_-гнаться
+V+Perf+IV:на́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́н Perf_Fut_2_shift_R ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 5 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_5a_ать_Lxc
св_нп_5a_ать_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_5a_еть_Lxc
св_5a?_еть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_5a_еть_прич._страд._ви/денный_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:е Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_5b/c_а́ть_Lxc
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_5c/c_-гнать_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:на́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́н Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:на́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́н Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:на PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_5c_а́ть_Lxc
св_5c?_а́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_5a_еть_повел._затрудн._прич._страд._ви/денный_Lxc
+V+Impf+IV:е Impf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_ImpPrb ;
+V+Impf+TV:е Impf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_ImpPrb ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_5b/c_а́ть_деепр._затрудн._Lxc ! спать
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end_VAPrb_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_нп_5a_ать_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_Impи ;

LEXICON св_5a?_еть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:е Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_shift ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
PastAct_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_5c?_а́ть_Lxc
св_нп_5b_а́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_нп_5b_а́ть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;


!====================================== Stem type 6 ======================================
!                                   сказать, писать, etc.
! Some 6a-ать and 6** verbs have present passive ppl
! 6a-ять has present passive ppl
