src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
спаться:сп нсв_5b/c''_а́ть_R_безл. "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
держать:де́рж нсв_5c_а́ть "weight: 3.7425567162738385" ;
держаться:де́рж нсв_5c_а́ть_R "weight: 3.14522021602433" ;
содержаться:соде́рж нсв_5c_а́ть_R "weight: 3.990914405043524" ;
дышаться:ды́ш нсв_5c_а́ть_R_безл. ;
смотреть:смо́тр нсв_5c_е́ть "weight: 3.5683084799133535" ;
вертеть:ве́рт нсв_5c_е́ть "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
смотреться:смо́тр нсв_5c_е́ть_R "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
вертеться:ве́рт нсв_5c_е́ть_R "weight: 2.8183829567540637" ;
терпеться:те́рп нсв_5c_е́ть_R_безл. ;
хотеться:хо́т нсв_5c_е́ть_R_безл._хотеться ;
хотеть:хо́т нсв_5c'?_е́ть_наст._2_ед._хо/чешь,_3_ед._хо/чет "weight: 2.8840617323980413" ;
гнаться:г нсв_5c/c''_гнаться "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
гнать:г нсв_5c/cs_гнать "weight: 2.7765468877064814" ;
терпеть:те́рп нсв_5c4?_е́ть "weight: 3.14522021602433" ;
содержать:соде́рж нсв_5c?_а́ть "weight: 4.321450649726901" ;
дышать:ды́ш нсв_нп_5c4_а́ть "weight: 3.3469848748372875" ;
сидеться:сид св_5b_е́ть_R_безл. ;
достоять:досто́ св_5b_я́ть ;
простоять:просто́ св_5b_я́ть "weight: 2.4606253366411552" ;
настояться:насто́ св_5b_я́ть_R "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
устояться:усто́ св_5b_я́ть_R "weight: 3.676576294858468" ;
настояться:насто́ св_5b_я́ть_R_повел._затрудн. "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
состояться:состо́ св_5b_я́ть_R_повел._затрудн. "weight: 4.025539011069863" ;
настоять:насто́ св_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн. "weight: 2.781399390500894" ;
отстоять:отсто́ св_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн. "weight: 2.9915097368460057" ;
наспать:на́сп св_5b/c_а́ть ;
переспать:пере́сп св_5b/c_а́ть "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
проспать:про́сп св_5b/c_а́ть "weight: 2.0032481401172504" ;
доспаться:досп св_5b/c''_а́ть_R ;
проспаться:просп св_5b/c''_а́ть_R "weight: 1.9732849167398068" ;
поглядеть:погляд св_5b?_е́ть ;
обозреть:обозр св_5b?_е́ть ;
поиздержать:поизде́рж св_5c_а́ть ;
одержать:оде́рж св_5c_а́ть "weight: 3.1695795618837748" ;
додержаться:доде́рж св_5c_а́ть_R ;
удержаться:уде́рж св_5c_а́ть_R "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
недосмотреть:недосмо́тр св_5c_е́ть "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
навертеть:наве́рт св_5c_е́ть "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
развертеться:разве́рт св_5c_е́ть_R ;
перехотеться:перехо́т св_5c'_е́ть_R_безл._-хотеться ;
расхотеться:расхо́т св_5c'_е́ть_R_безл._-хотеться ;
захотеть:захо́т св_5c'?_е́ть_буд._2_ед._хо/ч|ешь,_3_ед._-ет "weight: 2.499254738997286" ;
отогнать:от%^Oг св_5c/c_-гнать "weight: 2.258520645220556" ;
угнаться:у́г св_5c/c''_-гнаться ;
дотерпеть:доте́рп св_5cs_е́ть ;
протерпеть:проте́рп св_5cs_е́ть ;
захрапеть:захрап св_нп_5b_е́ть ;
обгореть:обгор св_нп_5b_е́ть "weight: 3.2664895748918314" ;
подудеть:подуд св_нп_5b_е́ть_буд._1_ед._затрудн. ;
зашелестеть:зашелест св_нп_5b_е́ть_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
постоять:посто́ св_нп_5b_я́ть "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
настоять:насто́ св_нп_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн. "weight: 2.781399390500894" ;
устоять:усто́ св_нп_5b_я́ть_повел._затрудн. "weight: 2.258520645220556" ;
недоспать:недосп св_нп_5b/c_а́ть "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
поспать:посп св_нп_5b/c_а́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
надышать:нады́ш св_нп_5c_а́ть "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
подышать:поды́ш св_нп_5c_а́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
утерпеть:уте́рп св_нп_5c_е́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
расхотеть:расхо́т св_нп_5c_-хотеть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
восхотеть:восхо́т св_нп_5c_-хотеть ;
велеть:вел св-нсв_[но_в_прош._и_инф._преимущ._св]_нп_5b_е́ть "weight: 2.3712249254118443" ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
видеть:ви́д нсв_5a_еть_повел._затрудн._прич._страд._ви/денный_Lxc "weight: 4.057094566969503" ;
спать:сп нсв_нп_5b/c_а́ть_деепр._затрудн._Lxc "weight: 4.23911311899197" ;
услышать:услы́ш св_5a_ать_Lxc "weight: 3.9673505596401997" ;
обидеть:оби́д св_5a_еть_Lxc "weight: 3.8378807464533415" ;
увидеть:уви́д св_5a_еть_прич._страд._ви/денный_Lxc "weight: 4.009571533496123" ;
заспать:за́сп св_5b/c_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 2.534727057159505" ;
сдержать:сде́рж св_5c_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 3.1534927419903203" ;
загнать:за́г св_5c/c_-гнать_Lxc "weight: 3.502935222735654" ;
